Wyoming, session 2025, SF0022.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 14-2-309(a) by creating a new
paragraph (x) is amended to read:
14-2-309. Grounds for termination of parent-child
relationship; clear and convincing evidence.
(a) The parent-child legal relationship may be
terminated if any one (1) or more of the following facts is
established by clear and convincing evidence:
(x) The child has been appointed a guardian who
is a relative of the child, the child has been under the
guardian's care for at least twenty-four (24) consecutive
months and a showing that the parent is unfit to have
custody and control of the child. As used in this
paragraph, "relative" means as defined by W.S.
3-2-301(a)(iii).
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 83, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2